apertium-uzb.uzb.lexc
LEXICON GER-POSSESSIVES

%<px1sg%>:%>%{I%}m GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px2sg%>:%>%{I%}ng GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px3sp%>:%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px1pl%>:%>%{I%}m%{I%}z GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px2pl%>:%>%{I%}ngd%{A%}r GER-CASE-ETC ;

%<px2sg%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}ng%{I%}z GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px2pl%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}ng%{I%}zd%{A%}r GER-CASE-ETC ;

LEXICON GER-INFL

GER-POSSESSIVES ;
GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}r GER-POSSESSIVES ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}r GER-CASE-ETC ;
GER-ABE-ETC ;

!!!!!!!   end of gerunds inflection lexicon


LEXICON Copula

e%<cop%>%<ger_past%>:ekan GER-POSSESSIVES ;
e%<cop%>%<ger_perf%>:ekan%>%{L%}%{I%}k GER-POSSESSIVES ;

! This is an evidential aorist form, not past -JNW
e%<cop%>%<aor%>%<evid%>:ekan V-PERS-S1 ;
e%<cop%>%<neg%>%<aor%>%<evid%>:emas% ekan V-PERS-S1 ;

е%<cop%>%<ifi%>:е%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-S2 ;

е%<cop%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:emas V-PERS-S1 ;


LEXICON NUM

%<num%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;  
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>inchi  # ;
                   
%<num%>: # ;                                    


LEXICON NP1-ORG

%<np%>%<org%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<np%>%<org%>: SUBST ;
%<np%>%<org%>%<attr%>: # ;


LEXICON SUBST

N-INFL-COMMON ; 
%<pl%>:%>lar N-INFL-COMMON ;
%<loc%>%<attr%>:%>dagi # ;



! LEXICON #
!
!# ; 

LEXICON N-INFL-COMMON

POSS-REAL ;
CASE-ETC ;

LEXICON POSS-REAL 

%<px1sg%>:%>%{i%}m CASE-ETC ;                
%<px2sg%>:%>%{i%}ng CASE-ETC ;                 
%<px3sp%>:%>%{s%}i CASE-ETC ; 
%<px1pl%>:%>%{i%}miz CASE-ETC ;           
%<px2pl%>:%>%{i%}ngiz CASE-ETC ;      
%<px3pl%>:%>lari CASE-ETC ; 

LEXICON POSS-REAL-NONOM

%<px1sg%>:%>%{i%}m CASE-NONOM ;                
%<px2sg%>:%>%{i%}ng CASE-NONOM ;                 
%<px3sp%>:%>%{s%}i CASE-NONOM ; 
%<px1pl%>:%>%{i%}miz CASE-NONOM ;           
%<px2pl%>:%>%{i%}ngiz CASE-NONOM;      
%<px3pl%>:%>lari CASE-NONOM ; 

LEXICON CASE-ETC

CASE ;
GENPOSS-ETC ;
%<nom%>: SUB-COP ;  ! FIXME

LEXICON CASE 

%<nom%>: # ;               
%<gen%>:%>ning # ;      
%<dat%>:%>ga # ;   
%<acc%>:%>ni # ;
%<loc%>:%>da # ;   
%<abl%>:%>dan # ;  
! %<ins%>:%>ins # ;   

LEXICON CASE-NONOM

%<gen%>:%>ning # ;      
%<dat%>:%>ga # ;   
%<acc%>:%>ni # ;
%<loc%>:%>da # ;   
%<abl%>:%>dan # ;  
! %<ins%>:%>ins # ;  

LEXICON GENPOSS-ETC 

! %<px%>:%>%{n%}%{I%}ki%{pN%} CASE ;
%<loc%>%<attr%>:%>dagi # ;

LEXICON SUB-COP

%+e%<cop%>:%>dir # ;  

LEXICON PRON-PERS

men%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:men # ; 
men%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:mening # ; 
men%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:menga # ; 
men%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:meni # ; 
men%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:menda # ; 
men%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:mendan # ; 


sen%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:sen # ; 
sen%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:sening # ; 
sen%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:senga # ; 
sen%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:seni # ; 
sen%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:senda # ; 
sen%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:sendan # ; 


u%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:u # ; 
u%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:uning # ; 
u%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:unga # ; 
u%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:uni # ; 
u%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:unda # ; 
u%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:undan # ; 


biz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:biz # ; 
biz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:bizlar # ; 

biz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:bizning # ; 
biz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:bizga # ; 
biz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:bizni # ; 
biz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:bizda # ; 
biz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<abl%>:bizdan # ; 



sizlar%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:sizlar # ; 
sizlar%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:sizlarning # ; 
sizlar%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:sizlarga # ; 
sizlar%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:sizlarni # ; 
sizlar%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:sizlarda # ; 
sizlar%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<abl%>:sizlardan # ;

siz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:siz # ; 
siz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:sizning # ; 
siz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:sizga # ; 
siz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:sizni # ; 
siz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:sizda # ; 
siz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<abl%>:sizdan # ; 


ular%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ular # ; 
ular%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:ularning # ; 
ular%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:ularga # ; 
ular%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:ularni # ; 
ular%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:ularda # ; 
ular%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<abl%>:ulardan # ; 

LEXICON TIT 

%<title%>: # ; 

LEXICON ABBR

%<abbr%>: # ; 


LEXICON INTERJ

%<ij%>: # ;


LEXICON DIGITLEX

%0:%0 LOOP ;
1:1   LOOP ;
2:2   LOOP ;
3:3   LOOP ;
4:4   LOOP ;
5:5   LOOP ;
6:6   LOOP ;
7:7   LOOP ;
8:8   LOOP ;
9:9   LOOP ;

LEXICON LOOP

%,:%, DIGITLEX ;
%.:%. DIGITLEX ;
%,:%, LASTDIGIT ;
%.:%. LASTDIGIT ;
%,:%, LASTDIGIT-REST ;
%.:%. LASTDIGIT-REST ;
%,:%, POWERS ;
%.:%. POWERS ;
      DIGITLEX ;
      LASTDIGIT ;
      LASTDIGIT-REST ;
      POWERS ;
      
LEXICON POWERS
%0%0:%0%0    NUM-DIGIT ; ! "yüz"
%0%0%0:%0%0%0 NUM-DIGIT ; ! "bin"

LEXICON NUM-DIGIT

%<num%>: # ;
%<num%>%<subst%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<num%>%<subst%>: # ; ! Dir/LR

!%<num%>%<ord%>:%'%{i%}nc%{I%} # ;
!%<num%>%<ord%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:%'%{I%}nc%{I%} # ;
!%<num%>%<ord%>%<subst%>:%'%{I%}nc%{i%} # ;

!%<num%>%<coll%>%<advl%>:%-%{A%}у # ;
!%<num%>%<coll%>%<nom%>:%-%{A%}у # ;
!%<num%>%<coll%>:%-%{A%}у # ;

!%<num%>%<percent%>:%% # ;
!%<num%>%<percent%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:%% # ;
!%<num%>%<percent%>%<subst%>:%%{a%}%{z%}%- # ;

LEXICON LASTDIGIT

1:1 NUM-DIGIT ; ! "bir"
2:2 NUM-DIGIT ; ! "iki"
3:3 NUM-DIGIT ; ! "üç"
4:4 NUM-DIGIT ; ! "dört"
5:5 NUM-DIGIT ; ! "beş"
6:6 NUM-DIGIT ; ! "altı"
7:7 NUM-DIGIT ; ! "yedi"
8:8 NUM-DIGIT ; ! "sekiz"
9:9 NUM-DIGIT ; ! "dokuz"

LEXICON LASTDIGIT-REST

1%0:1%0 NUM-DIGIT ; ! "on"
2%0:2%0 NUM-DIGIT ; ! "yirmi"
3%0:3%0 NUM-DIGIT ; ! "otuz"
4%0:4%0 NUM-DIGIT ; ! "kırk"
5%0:5%0 NUM-DIGIT ; ! "elli"
6%0:6%0 NUM-DIGIT ; ! "altmış"
7%0:7%0 NUM-DIGIT ; ! "yetmiş"
8%0:8%0 NUM-DIGIT ; ! "seksen"
9%0:9%0 NUM-DIGIT ; ! "doksan"

LEXICON PRON-ITG-INFL

%<prn%>%<itg%>: SUBST ;

LEXICON PRON-NEG

%<prn%>%<neg%>: SUBST ;




LEXICON Titles

Professor:Professor TIT ; ! ""
prof:prof TIT ; ! ""
Sulton:Sulton TIT ; ! ""
Posho:Posho TIT ; ! ""
sarkarda:sarkarda N1 ; ! "colonel"


LEXICON Pronouns

PRON-PERS ;

bu:bu PRON-DEM-BU ; ! "this"
shu:shu PRON-DEM-BU ; ! "this"
o:o PRON-DEM-BU ; ! "this"
ushbu:ushbu PRON-DEM-BU ; ! "this"
o%'sha:o%'sha PRON-DEM-BU ; ! ""


hech% kim:hech% kim PRON-NEG ; ! "nobody"
hech% nima:hech% nima PRON-NEG ; ! "nothing"
hech% qachon:hech% qachon PRON-NEG ; ! "never"
hech% qaysi:hech% qaysi PRON-NEG ; ! "neither"
hech% qaerda:hech% qaerda PRON-NEG ; ! "nowhere"
hech% qanday:hech% qanday PRON-NEG ; ! "not any"
hech% qancha:hech% qancha PRON-NEG ; ! "not at all"



LEXICON Determinatives

bir:bir DET-IND ; ! "a"
har% qanday:har% qanday DET-IND ; ! ""
barcha:barcha DET-DEM ; ! "every"
yuzlab:yuzlab DET-QNT ; ! "hundreds"
butun:butun DET-QNT ; ! "all of it"
minglab:minglab DET-QNT ; ! "thousands"
ko%'plab:ko%'plab DET-QNT ; ! "hundreds"
hamma:hamma DET-QNT ; ! "all of them"
Ayrimlar:Ayrimlar DET-DEM ; ! "some other"
har:har DET-DEM ; ! "each"
biron:biron DET-DEM ; ! "some"
necha:necha DET-ITG ; ! " how many"
qay:qay DET-DEM ; ! ""


LEXICON Interjections

ey:ey INTERJ ; ! "hey"
barakalla:barakalla INTERJ ; ! "whiz"
yo%'q:yo%'q INTERJ ; ! "no"
ha:ha INTERJ ; ! "yes"
albatta:albatta INTERJ ; ! "of course"
aytganday:aytganday INTERJ ; ! ""
demak:demak INTERJ ; ! ""





ora:ora PRON-ADV ; ! "there"


LEXICON Postadverbs

faqat:faqat POSTADV ; ! "only"
! эле:эле POSTADV ; ! "only"
! деле:деле POSTADV ; ! "even"
! деле:дале POSTADV ; ! "even" ! FIXME: treat as separate word or as dialectal variant
! дагы:дагы POSTADV ; ! "... дагы" = "and ... too"
! ашуун:ашуун POSTADV ; ! "more than"
! ашык:ашык POSTADV ; ! "more than"
! тең:тең POSTADV ; ! "~both" e.g., экөө тең
! болсо:болсо POSTADV ; ! "as for"

LEXICON Nouns
km:km ABBR ;  ! "km" ! FIXME: abbr
ton:ton ABBR ; ! "ton"
cm:cm ABBR ;  ! "cm"
kvadrat:kvadrat ABBR ; ! "^2"
kilometr:kilometr ABBR ; ! "kilometre"
km2:km2 ABBR ; ! "squar km"
mil:mil ABBR ; ! ""
kg:kg ABBR ; ! ""
y%.:y%. ABBR ; ! ""
avg%.:avg%. ABBR ;
sent%.:sent%. ABBR ;
okt%.:okt%. ABBR ; 
noyab%.:noyab%. ABBR ;
apr%.:apr%. ABBR ; ! "april"
avg:avg ABBR ; ! "august"
Daily% Mail:Daily% Mail NP1-ORG ; ! ""
AP:AP NP1-ORG ; ! ""
UNDP:UNDP NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Yerelnet:Yerelnet NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Troyka:Troyka NP1-ORG ; ! ""
SYRIZA:SYRIZA NP1-ORG ; ! ""
PKK:PKK NP1-ORG ; ! ""
IMF:IMF NP1-ORG ; ! ""
AFP:AFP NP1-ORG ; ! ""
UNESCO:UNESCO NP1-ORG ; ! ""
PASOK:PASOK%{p%} NP1-ORG ; ! ""
BBC:BBC NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Bild:Bild NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Olimpiyat:Olimpiyat NP1-ORG ; ! "olympics"
FT:FT NP1-ORG ; ! 
Gazprom:Gazprom NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Deutsche% Telekom:Deutsche% Telekom NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Getty% Images:Getty% Images NP1-ORG ; ! ""
The% Times:The% Times NP1-ORG ; ! ""
PfP:PfP NP1-ORG ; ! ""
AP:AP  NP1-ORG ; ! ""
DPA:DPA NP1-ORG ; ! ""
AGİT:AGİT NP1-ORG ; ! ""
EULEX:EULEX NP1-ORG ; ! ""
HDZ:HDZ NP1-ORG ; ! ""
VOA:VOA NP1-ORG ; ! ""
CNN:CNN  NP1-ORG ; ! ""
PACE:PACE NP1-ORG ; ! "Parliamentary Assembly of the Council of Europe"
UDMR:UDMR  NP1-ORG ; ! ""
EIB:EIB  NP1-ORG ; ! ""
UNDP:UNDP NP1-ORG ; ! ""
UEFA:UEFA NP1-ORG ; ! ""
HSBC:HSBC NP1-ORG ; ! ""
BM:BM NP1-ORG ; ! "UN (United Nations)"
BHF:BHF NP1-ORG ; ! ""
PSD:PSD NP1-ORG ; ! ""
DSS:DSS NP1-ORG ; ! ""
DUI:DUI NP1-ORG ; ! ""
DS:DS NP1-ORG ; ! ""
SDSM:SDSM NP1-ORG ; ! ""
HINA:HINA NP1-ORG ; ! ""
PDK:PDK NP1-ORG ; ! ""
UPI:UPI NP1-ORG ; ! ""
KLA:KLA NP1-ORG ; ! ""
DPS:DPS NP1-ORG ; ! ""
PIC:PIC NP1-ORG ; ! ""
SDP:SDP NP1-ORG ; ! ""
RFE:RFE NP1-ORG ; ! "Radio Free Europe"
SE:SE NP1-ORG ; ! ""
SRS:SRS NP1-ORG ; ! "Serbian Radical Party"
BDP:BDP NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Facebook:Facebook NP1-ORG ; ! ""
The% Guardian:The% Guardian NP1-ORG ; ! ""
The% Wall% Street% Journal:The% Wall% Street% Journal NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Akhisar:Akhisar NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Beşiktaş% JK:Beşiktaş% JK NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Bursaspor:Bursaspor NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Eskişehirspor:Eskişehirspor NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Fenerbahçe:Fenerbahçe NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Galatasaray:Galatasaray NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Gençlerbirliği:Gençlerbirliği NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Karabükspor:Karabükspor NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Mersin% İdman% Yurdu:Mersin% İdman% Yurdu NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Sivasspor:Sivasspor NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Ankaragücü-Ankaragücü NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Göztepe:Göztepe NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Adanaspor:Adanaspor NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Kocaelispor:Kocaelispor NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Antalyaspor:Antalyaspor NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Karşıyaka:Karşıyaka NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Vefa% SK:Vefa% SK NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Zonguldakspor:Zonguldakspor NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Türk% Telekomspor:Türk% Telekomspor NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Konyaspor:Konyaspor NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Malatyaspor:Malatyaspor NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Beypazarı% Şekerspor:Beypazarı% Şekerspor NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Feriköy:Feriköy NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Beykozspor:Beykozspor NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Ankaraspor:Ankaraspor NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Giresunspor:Giresunspor NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Kardemir% Karabükspor:Kardemir% Karabükspor NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Vanspor:Vanspor NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Aydınspor:Aydınspor NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Çannakale% Dardanelspor:Çannakale% Dardanelspor NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Alibeyköyspor:Alibeyköyspor NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Yeşildirek:Yeşildirek NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Yozgatspor:Yozgatspor NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Kayseri:Kayseri NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Bucaspor:Bucaspor NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Kırıkkalespor:Kırıkkalespor NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Siirtspor:Siirtspor NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Inter:Inter NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Pro% Vercelli: Pro% Vercelli NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Lazio:Lazio NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Sampdoria:Sampdoria NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Palermo:Palermo NP1-ORG ; ! ""
SPAL:SPAL NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Manchester% United:Manchester% United NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Everton:Everton NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Chelsea:Chelsea NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Wolverhampton% Wanderers:Wolverhampton% Wanderers NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Tottenham% Hotspur: Tottenham% Hotspur NP1-ORG ; ! "
Athletic% Bilbao:Athletic% Bilbao NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Betis:Betis NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Espanyol:Espanyol NP1-ORG  ; ! ""
Malaga:Malaga NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Real% Madrid: Real% Madrid NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Valladolid:Valladolid NP1-ORG ; ! ""
